South Dakota, session 2026, HB1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-24B-24 be AMENDED:
22-24B-24. No person who is required to register as a sex offender, as defined in
this chapter, may loiter within enter a community safety zone or a public library unless
the person, including for the purpose of observing or contacting a minor related to or in
the care and custody of the person.
This section does not apply if the offender was under the age of eighteen at the
time of the offense and the offender was not tried and convicted of the offense as an adult,
or the circuit court has entered an order pursuant to § 22-24B-28 exempting the offender
from the provisions of §§ 22-24B-22 to 22-24B-28, inclusive.
A violation of this section is a Class 6 felony. Any subsequent violation is a Class 5
felony.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.